Washington statutes.
RCW 16.65.037

License—Restrictions—Fees.

(1) Any license issued under the provisions of this chapter shall only be valid at the location and for the sales day or days for which the license was issued.

(2) The license fee shall be based on the average gross sales volume per official sales day of a market in the previous twelve months or, for a new market, the projected average gross sales per official sales day of the market during its first year's operation.

(a) The license fee for markets with an average gross sales volume up to and including ten thousand dollars is one hundred sixty-five dollars.

(b) The license fee for markets with an average gross sales volume over ten thousand dollars and up to and including fifty thousand dollars is three hundred thirty dollars.

(c) The license fee for markets with an average gross sales volume over fifty thousand dollars is four hundred ninety-five dollars.

(3) Any applicant operating more than one public livestock market shall make a separate application for a license to operate each public livestock market, and each application shall be accompanied by the appropriate license fee.

[ 2019 c 92 s 10; 2003 c 326 s 66; 1997 c 356 s 9; 1997 c 356 s 8; 1995 c 374 s 57.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2003 c 326: See RCW 16.57.902.

Effective dates—1997 c 356: See note following RCW 16.57.220.

Effective date—Expiration date—1995 c 374 ss 48, 49, 56, and 57: See note following RCW 16.57.220.